Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-1009
Rate or charge; yield authorized.

(1) No rate or charge determined by the commission pursuant to the Water Service Regulation Act may yield more than a fair return on the fair value of property used and useful in rendering service to the public.

(2) The commission shall not include in the basis for establishment of the rate or charge any amounts spent by the private water company for advertising or other public relations expenses.

Laws 1994, LB 1002, § 9.